Tennessee, session 114, SB0807.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1307, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(k)
(1) It is an offense for a person to store a handgun, whether loaded or
unloaded, in a motor vehicle while the person is not in the motor vehicle unless
the handgun is kept from ordinary observation and locked within the trunk, utility
or glove box, or a locked container securely affixed to the motor vehicle.
(2) As used in this subsection (k):
(A) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as defined in
subdivision (e)(2)(A); and
(B) "Trunk" means the fully enclosed and locked main storage
compartment of a motor vehicle that is not accessible from the passenger
compartment but does not include any compartment that has a window,
the bed of a pickup truck, or the rear area of a hatchback, station wagon-
type motor vehicle, or sport utility motor vehicle.
(3) A violation of this subsection (k) is a Class C misdemeanor,
punishable only by the completion of a court-approved handgun safety course.
The court shall not impose a fine or incarceration as punishment for a violation of
this subsection (k).
SB0807
001276
- 1 -

SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1313(a)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting the following:
(2)
(A) The firearm or ammunition being transported or stored in the motor
vehicle is kept from ordinary observation if the person is in the motor vehicle; or
(B)
(i) The ammunition being transported or stored in the motor
vehicle is kept from ordinary observation and locked within the trunk,
glove box, or interior of the person's motor vehicle or a container securely
affixed to the motor vehicle if the person is not in the motor vehicle;
(ii) The firearm being transported or stored in the motor vehicle is
other than a handgun and is kept from ordinary observation and locked
within the trunk, glove box, or interior of the person's motor vehicle or a
container securely affixed to the motor vehicle if the person is not in the
motor vehicle; or
(iii) The firearm being transported or stored in the motor vehicle is
a handgun and is stored in accordance with § 39-17-1307(i) if the person
is not in the vehicle.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 13, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) A person who owns a handgun shall report the loss or theft of the handgun to
a law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the location where the handgun was lost
or stolen within twenty-four (24) hours of the discovery of the loss or theft.
- 2 - 001276

(b) A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor, punishable only by the
completion of a court-approved handgun safety course. The court shall not impose a
fine or incarceration as punishment for a violation of this section.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 001276